Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.460

Job order procedure—Required information.

Each public body shall maintain and make available the following information for each job order contract:

(1) A list of work orders issued;

(2) The cost of each work order;

(3) A list of subcontractors hired under each work order, including whether those subcontractors were certified small, minority, women, or veteran-owned businesses; and

(4) A copy of the intent to pay prevailing wage and the affidavit of wages paid for each work order subcontract.

[ 2021 c 230 s 17; 2012 c 102 s 3; 2007 c 494 s 405.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.